Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that:(1) Dementia is a general term for loss of memory, language, problem solving, and other thinking abilities that are severe enough to interfere with daily life, with Alzheimer's disease being the most common form of dementia.(2) More than 10 percent of Washingtonians over 65 are living with Alzheimer's disease or other forms of dementia, which in 2025 was more than 126,000 individuals.(3) People with dementia require increasing amounts of care as their condition progresses. Much of that care is often provided by unpaid caregivers. In Washington, 254,000 unpaid caregivers provide more than 390,000,000 hours of unpaid care totaling $11,000,000,000 in unpaid care.(4) For people with dementia who require professional care, the state spends $747,000,000 annually on medicaid costs to provide care. Much of that care is provided in long-term care facilities.(5) Dementia disproportionately affects marginalized communities, with African Americans twice as likely to develop dementia when compared to white Americans; Hispanic Americans are 1.5 times as likely to develop dementia when compared to white Americans; Native Americans also have a higher instance to develop dementia when compared to white Americans.(6) Underlying health conditions such as heart disease, diabetes, hearing loss, and smoking all increase the risk of dementia.(7) According to a two-year clinical study released by the Alzheimer's association in 2025, individuals can reduce their risk of dementia through modifiable lifestyle interventions including physical exercise, intellectually challenging and social activities, proper nutrition, and routine health monitoring.(8) The department of health conducts many kinds of public awareness campaigns and maintains websites to promote healthy living and education around modifiable health factors. These campaigns and websites provide key information to at-risk populations and are available in several languages spoken by Washington residents.(9) The department of health already educates health care providers in Washington about the importance of risk reduction and diagnosis of Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia, improving awareness, prevention, and early intervention.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:(1) When creating new or updating existing public health campaign websites or materials, the department shall consider including, where practicable and appropriate, information about dementia risk reduction when research shows a correlation between the subject of the public health campaign and dementia risk reduction. The updated material shall be made available in all languages currently provided by the department.(2) When creating new or updating existing health care provider information, websites, or materials, the department shall consider including, where practicable and appropriate, information about dementia risk reduction and dementia diagnoses when research shows a correlation between the new or updated health care provider information and dementia risk reduction.(3) The department shall consult with subject matter experts specific to Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia when compiling information about dementia risk reduction or diagnosis for health care providers or the public.--- END ---